pl: Tolerancja rezystancji: ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Inne
zh-CN: 电阻容差: ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; 其他
lt-LT: Varžos tolerancija: ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Kita
sk-SK: Tolerancia odporu: ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Iné
th: ความคลาดเคลื่อนความต้านทาน: ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; อื่นๆ
vi: Dung sai điện trở: ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Khác
ja: 抵抗許容誤差: ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; その他
sv: Resistanstolerans: ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Övrigt
fi: Resistanssin toleranssi: ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Muu
zh-TW: 電阻公差: ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; 其他
fr: Tolérance de résistance: ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Autre
es: Tolerancia de resistencia: ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Otros
de: Widerstandstoleranz: ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Tolerância de resistência: ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Outro
ru: Допуск сопротивления: ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Другой
da: Modstandstolerance: ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Andet
pt-BR: Tolerância de resistência: ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Outro
it: Tolleranza della resistenza: ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Altro
nb: Motstand toleranse: ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Annet
nl: Weerstand tolerantie: ± 0,1 %; ± 0,25 %; ± 0,5 %; ± 1 %; ± 10 %; ± 2 %; ± 20 %; ± 5 %; Andere
sl-SI: Toleranca upora: ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Drugo
bg-BG: Толеранс на съпротивлението: ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Други
el: Ανοχή αντίστασης: ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Άλλο
cs: Tolerance odporu: ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±5 %; Jiné
hr-HR: Tolerancija otpora: ± 0,1 %; ± 0,25 %; ± 0,5 %; ± 1 %; ± 10 %; ± 2 %; ± 20 %; ± 5 %; Ostalo
ro-RO: Toleranță rezistență: ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Altele
hu: Ellenállási tűréshatár: ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Egyéb
en: Resistance tolerance: ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; Other
ko: 저항 허용 오차: ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±2%; ±20%; ±5%; 기타
tr: Direnç toleransı: %±0.1; %±0.25; %±0.5; %±1; %±10; %±2; %±20; %±5; Diğer